District of Columbia statutes.
34-2708

Mandamus or injunction.

If any person proposes to engage or is engaging in excavation or demolition in the District of Columbia without complying with this chapter, or in a negligent or unsafe manner, or by using a procedure which has resulted in, or is likely to result in, damage to an underground facility, the owner of such underground facility or the Corporation Counsel may commence an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, for the purpose of having such negligent or unsafe excavation or demolition stopped and prevented, by either mandamus or injunction. The Court may join as parties any persons necessary or proper to make its judgment or process effective and, if appropriate, shall issue a final order granting such relief.

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-129, § 9, 28 DCR 264
1981 Ed., § 43-1708.